Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-708
Articles of incorporation; filing; certificate of incorporation; issuance.

The original copy of the articles of incorporation shall be signed by the incorporators, and acknowledged before any officer authorized by the law of this state to acknowledge the execution of deeds and conveyances. It shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State. If the Secretary of State finds that the articles of incorporation conform to law, he shall, when the fees prescribed by section 70-733 have been paid, (1) endorse on the original copy the word filed, and the month, day and year of the filing thereof; (2) file the original in his office; and (3) issue a certificate of incorporation to the incorporators. The incorporators shall file for recording a true copy of the articles of incorporation in the office of the county clerk in the county in which the principal office of the corporation in this state is located.

Laws 1937, c. 50, § 8, p. 206;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-808;

R.S.1943, § 70-708.